Washington statutes.
RCW 36.04.050

Clallam county.

Clallam county shall consist of the territory bounded as follows, to wit: Commencing at the northwest corner of Jefferson county at a point opposite the middle of the channel between Protection Island and Diamond Point on the west of Port Discovery Bay; thence following up the middle of said channel to a point directly east of the mouth of Eagle creek; thence west to the mouth of Eagle creek; thence one mile west from the mouth of said creek; thence south to the north boundary line of township twenty-seven north, range two west; thence west to the west boundary of the state in the Pacific Ocean; thence northerly along said boundary to a point marking the north terminus of the west boundary of the state in the Pacific Ocean opposite the Strait of Juan de Fuca; thence easterly along said Strait of Juan de Fuca, where it forms the boundary between the state and British possessions, to the place of beginning.

[(i) 1869 p 292 s 1; 1867 p 45 s 1; 1854 p 472 s 1; RRS s 3929. (ii) 1925 ex.s. c 40 s 1; RRS s 3963-1.]